test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-Clex_tuhhid_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
    luodˊdiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: luodˊdii
    luodˊdiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: lyedˊdejus
    luodˊdiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: lyedˊdejoon
    luodˊdiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: lyedˊdejee
    luodˊdiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: lyedˊdejus
    luodˊdiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: lyedˊdejop
    luodˊdiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: luodˊdiđ
    luodˊdiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: lyedˊdejus
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: luodˊdii
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: luodˊdim
    luodˊdiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: luodˊdiiččim
    luodˊdiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: luodˊdiižii
    luodˊdiđ+V+PrsPrc: [lyedˊdejeijee, lyedˊdejijjee]
    luodˊdiđ+V+PrfPrc: luodˊdim
    luodˊdiđ+V+Actio: luodˊdim
    luodˊdiđ+V+Actio+Ess: luodˊdiimin
    luodˊdiđ+V+Actio+Loc: luodˊdiimist
    luodˊdiđ+V+Actio+Ill: luodˊdiimân
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ger: luodˊdiidijn
    luodˊdiđ+V+VAbess: luodˊdiihánnáá
    
    
      Verb - toppiđ: # 
    toppiđ+V+Inf: toppiđ
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toppiim
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: toppiih
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuápˊpee
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tuápˊpejeen
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: toppiivettee
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: toppiv
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: toppip
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: toppiivetteđ
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tuápˊpejeh
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tuápˊpejim
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tuápˊpejih
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: toppij
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: toppijm
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: toppijd
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: toppijn
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: toppijm
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: toppijd
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tuápˊpejii
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: toppiiččim
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: toppiiččih
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: toppiiččij
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Du1: toppiiččáim
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Du2: toppiiččáid
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Du3: toppiiččáin
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: toppiiččijm
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: toppiiččijd
    toppiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: toppiiččii
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: toppiižeem
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: toppiižeeh
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: toppiš            # toppiž
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Du1: toppiižeen
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Du2: toppišvettee      # toppižvettee
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Du3: toppiižává
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: toppiižep
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: toppišvetteđ      # toppižvetteđ 
    toppiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: toppiižeh
    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: tuápˊpejum
    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: toppii
    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: tuápˊpejus
    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: tuápˊpejoon
    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: tuápˊpejee
    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: tuápˊpejus
    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: tuápˊpejop
    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: toppiđ
    toppiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: tuápˊpejus
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toppii
    toppiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: toppim
    toppiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: toppiiččii
    toppiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: toppiižii
    toppiđ+V+PrsPrc: [tuápˊpejeijee, tuápˊpejijjee]
    toppiđ+V+PrfPrc: toppim
    toppiđ+V+Actio: toppim
    toppiđ+V+Actio+Ess: toppiimin
    toppiđ+V+Actio+Loc: toppiimist
    toppiđ+V+Actio+Ill: toppiimân
    toppiđ+V+Ger: toppiidijn
    toppiđ+V+VAbess: toppiihánnáá
    
    
      Verb - monniđ: # 
    monniđ+V+Inf: monniđ
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: monniim
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: monniih
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mannee
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: mannejeen
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: monniivettee
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: monniv
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: monnip
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: monniivetteđ
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mannejeh
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: mannejim
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: mannejih
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: monnij
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: monnijm
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: monnijd
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: monnijn
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: monnijm
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: monnijd
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: mannejii
    monniđ+V+Cond+Sg1: monniiččim
    monniđ+V+Cond+Sg2: monniiččih
    monniđ+V+Cond+Sg3: monniiččij
    monniđ+V+Cond+Du1: monniiččáim
    monniđ+V+Cond+Du2: monniiččáid
    monniđ+V+Cond+Du3: monniiččáin
    monniđ+V+Cond+Pl1: monniiččijm
    monniđ+V+Cond+Pl2: monniiččijd
    monniđ+V+Cond+Pl3: monniiččii
    monniđ+V+Pot+Sg1: monniižeem
    monniđ+V+Pot+Sg2: monniižeeh
    monniđ+V+Pot+Sg3: monniš            # monniž
    monniđ+V+Pot+Du1: monniižeen
    monniđ+V+Pot+Du2: monnišvettee      # monnižvettee
    monniđ+V+Pot+Du3: monniižává
    monniđ+V+Pot+Pl1: monniižep
    monniđ+V+Pot+Pl2: monnišvetteđ      # monnižvetteđ 
    monniđ+V+Pot+Pl3: monniižeh
    monniđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: mannejum
    monniđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: monnii
    monniđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: mannejus
    monniđ+V+Imprt+Du1: mannejoon
    monniđ+V+Imprt+Du2: mannejee
    monniđ+V+Imprt+Du3: mannejus
    monniđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: mannejop
    monniđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: monniđ
    monniđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: mannejus
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: monnii
    monniđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: monnim
    monniđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: monniiččii
    monniđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: monniižii
    monniđ+V+PrsPrc: [mannejeijee, mannejijjee]
    monniđ+V+PrfPrc: monnim
    monniđ+V+Actio: monnim
    monniđ+V+Actio+Ess: monniimin
    monniđ+V+Actio+Loc: monniimist
    monniđ+V+Actio+Ill: monniimân
    monniđ+V+Ger: monniidijn
    monniđ+V+VAbess: monniihánnáá
    
    
      Verb - orniđ: # 
    orniđ+V+Inf: orniđ
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orniim
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: orniih
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uárˊnee
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uárˊnejeen
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: orniivettee
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: orniv
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ornip
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: orniivetteđ
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uárˊnejeh
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uárˊnejim
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: uárˊnejih
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ornij
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: ornijm
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: ornijd
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: ornijn
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ornijm
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ornijd
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: uárˊnejii
    orniđ+V+Cond+Sg1: orniiččim
    orniđ+V+Cond+Sg2: orniiččih
    orniđ+V+Cond+Sg3: orniiččij
    orniđ+V+Cond+Du1: orniiččáim
    orniđ+V+Cond+Du2: orniiččáid
    orniđ+V+Cond+Du3: orniiččáin
    orniđ+V+Cond+Pl1: orniiččijm
    orniđ+V+Cond+Pl2: orniiččijd
    orniđ+V+Cond+Pl3: orniiččii
    orniđ+V+Pot+Sg1: orniižeem
    orniđ+V+Pot+Sg2: orniižeeh
    orniđ+V+Pot+Sg3: orniš          # orniž
    orniđ+V+Pot+Du1: orniižeen
    orniđ+V+Pot+Du2: ornišvettee    # ornižvettee
    orniđ+V+Pot+Du3: orniižává
    orniđ+V+Pot+Pl1: orniižep
    orniđ+V+Pot+Pl2: ornišvetteđ    # ornižvetteđ
    orniđ+V+Pot+Pl3: orniižeh
    orniđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: uárˊnejum
    orniđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ornii
    orniđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: uárˊnejus
    orniđ+V+Imprt+Du1: uárˊnejoon
    orniđ+V+Imprt+Du2: uárˊnejee
    orniđ+V+Imprt+Du3: uárˊnejus
    orniđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: uárˊnejop
    orniđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: orniđ
    orniđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: uárˊnejus
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ornii
    orniđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ornim
    orniđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: orniiččii
    orniđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: orniižii
    orniđ+V+PrsPrc: [uárˊnejeijee, uárˊnejijjee]
    orniđ+V+PrfPrc: ornim
    orniđ+V+Actio: ornim
    orniđ+V+Actio+Ess: orniimin
    orniđ+V+Actio+Loc: orniimist
    orniđ+V+Actio+Ill: orniimân
    orniđ+V+Ger: orniidijn
    orniđ+V+VAbess: orniihánnáá
    
    
         Verb - staaviđ: # 
    staaviđ+V+Inf: staaviđ
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: staaviim
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: staaviih
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stäävee
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: stäävejeen
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: staaviivettee
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: staaviv
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: staavip
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: staaviivetteđ
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: stäävejeh
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: stäävejim
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: stäävejih
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: staavij
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: staavijm
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: staavijd
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: staavijn
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: staavijm
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: staavijd
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: stäävejii
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Sg1: staaviiččim
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Sg2: staaviiččih
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Sg3: staaviiččij
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Du1: staaviiččáim
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Du2: staaviiččáid
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Du3: staaviiččáin
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Pl1: staaviiččijm
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Pl2: staaviiččijd
    staaviđ+V+Cond+Pl3: staaviiččii
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Sg1: staaviižeem
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Sg2: staaviižeeh
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Sg3: staaviš      
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Du1: staaviižeen
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Du2: staavišvettee     
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Du3: staaviižává
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Pl1: staaviižep
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Pl2: staavišvetteđ      
    staaviđ+V+Pot+Pl3: staaviižeh
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: stäävejum
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: staavii
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: stäävejus
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Du1: stäävejoon
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Du2: stäävejee
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Du3: stäävejus
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: stäävejop
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: staaviđ
    staaviđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: stäävejus
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: staavii
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: staavim
    staaviđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: staaviiččii
    staaviđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: staaviižii
    staaviđ+V+PrsPrc: [stäävejeijee, stäävejijjee]
    staaviđ+V+PrfPrc: staavim
    staaviđ+V+Actio: staavim
    staaviđ+V+Actio+Ess: staaviimin
    staaviđ+V+Actio+Loc: staaviimist
    staaviđ+V+Actio+Ill: staaviimân
    staaviđ+V+Ger: staaviidijn
    staaviđ+V+VAbess: staaviihánnáá
    
    
         Verb - nirviđ: # 
    nirviđ+V+Inf: nirviđ
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nirviim
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: nirviih
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nirvee
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: nirvejeen
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: nirviivettee
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: nirviv
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: nirvip
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: nirviivetteđ
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nirvejeh
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: nirvejim
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: nirvejih
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: nirvij
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: nirvijm
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: nirvijd
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: nirvijn
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: nirvijm
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: nirvijd
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: nirvejii
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Sg1: nirviiččim
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Sg2: nirviiččih
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Sg3: nirviiččij
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Du1: nirviiččáim
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Du2: nirviiččáid
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Du3: nirviiččáin
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Pl1: nirviiččijm
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Pl2: nirviiččijd
    nirviđ+V+Cond+Pl3: nirviiččii
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Sg1: nirviižeem
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Sg2: nirviižeeh
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Sg3: nirviš     
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Du1: nirviižeen
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Du2: nirvišvettee     
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Du3: nirviižává
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Pl1: nirviižep
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Pl2: nirvišvetteđ      
    nirviđ+V+Pot+Pl3: nirviižeh
    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: nirvejum
    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: nirvii
    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: nirvejus
    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Du1: nirvejoon
    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Du2: nirvejee
    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Du3: nirvejus
    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: nirvejop
    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: nirviđ
    nirviđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: nirvejus
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: nirvii
    nirviđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: nirvim
    nirviđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: nirviiččii
    nirviđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: nirviižii
    nirviđ+V+PrsPrc: [nirvejeijee, nirvejijjee]
    nirviđ+V+PrfPrc: nirvim
    nirviđ+V+Actio: nirvim
    nirviđ+V+Actio+Ess: nirviimin
    nirviđ+V+Actio+Loc: nirviimist
    nirviđ+V+Actio+Ill: nirviimân
    nirviđ+V+Ger: nirviidijn
    nirviđ+V+VAbess: nirviihánnáá
    
    
         Verb - rievˊviđ: # 
    rievviđ+V+Inf: rievˊviđ
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rievˊviim
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: rievˊviih
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rievˊvee
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: rievˊvejeen
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: rievˊviivettee
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: rievˊviv
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: rievˊvip
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: rievˊviivetteđ
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rievˊvejeh
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rievˊvejim
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: rievˊvejih
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: rievˊvij
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: rievˊvijm
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: rievˊvijd
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: rievˊvijn
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: rievˊvijm
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: rievˊvijd
    rievviđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: rievˊvejii
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Sg1: rievˊviiččim
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Sg2: rievˊviiččih
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Sg3: rievˊviiččij
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Du1: rievˊviiččáim
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Du2: rievˊviiččáid
    rievviđ+V+Cond+Du3: rievˊviiččáin
